Utah statutes.
19-6-312.   Preinvestigation requirements.

Before undertaking any remedial investigations on a facility on the hazardous substances priority list, the executive director shall make reasonable attempts to:

(1)  identify potentially responsible parties for each facility; and

(2)  send written notice to each potentially responsible party informing him of his potential responsibility.

